Washington statutes.
RCW 33.08.110

Branch association—Authorized—Procedure—Limitations—Discontinuance of branch, procedure.

An association with the written approval of the director, may establish and operate branches in any place within the state.

An association desiring to establish a branch shall file a written application therefor with the director, who shall approve or disapprove the application within four months after receipt.

The director's approval shall be conditioned on a finding that the resources in the market area of the proposed location offer a reasonable promise of adequate support for the proposed branch and that the proposed branch is not being formed for other than the legitimate purposes under this title. A branch shall not be established or permitted if the contingent fund, loss reserves and guaranty stock are less than the aggregate paid-in capital which would be required by law as a prerequisite to the establishment and operation of an equal number of branches in like locations by a commercial bank. If the application for a branch is not approved, the association shall have the right to appeal in the same manner and within the same time as provided by RCW 33.08.070 as now or hereafter amended. The association when delivering the application to the director shall transmit to the director a check in an amount established by rule to cover the expense of the investigation. An association shall not move any office more than two miles from its existing location without prior approval of the director.

The board of directors of an association, after notice to the director, may discontinue the operation of a branch. The association shall keep the director informed in the matter and shall notify the director of the date operation of the branch is discontinued.

[ 1994 c 92 s 434; 1982 c 3 s 21; 1974 ex.s. c 98 s 1; 1969 c 107 s 2; 1959 c 280 s 7.]

NOTES:

Severability—1982 c 3: See note following RCW 33.04.002.